Alabama, session 2026rs, SB188.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
39 Section 1. Section 13A-3-23, Code of Alabama 1975, is
40 amended to read as follows:
41 "§13A-3-23
42 (a) A person is justified in using physical force upon
43 another person in order to when both of the following are
44 satisfied:
45 (1) The person's use of force is to defend himself or
46 herself or a third person from what he or she reasonably
47 believes to be the use or imminent use of unlawful physical
48 force by anotherthat other person, and he or she may use.
49 (2) The person uses a degree of force which he or she
50 reasonably believes to be necessary for the purpose.
51 (b)(1) A person may use deadly physical force, and is
52 legally presumed to be justified in using deadly physical
53 force in self-defense or the defense of another person
54 pursuant to this subdivision (5), if the person reasonably
55 believes that another person is doing any of the following:
56 (1)a. Using or about to use unlawful deadly physical
Page 2

(1)a. Using or about to use unlawful deadly physical
SB188 INTRODUCED
57 force.
58 (2)b. Using or about to use physical force against an
59 occupant of a dwelling while committing or attempting to
60 commit a burglary of such dwelling.
61 (3)c. Committing or about to commit a kidnapping in any
62 degree, assault in the first or second degree, burglary in any
63 degree, robbery in any degree, forcible rape, or forcible
64 sodomy.
65 (4)d. Using or about to use physical force against an
66 owner, employee, or other person authorized to be on business
67 property when the business is closed to the public while
68 committing or attempting to commit a crime involving death,
69 serious physical injury, robbery, kidnapping, rape, sodomy, or
70 a crime of a sexual nature involving a child under the age of
71 12 years of age.
72 (5)e. In the process of unlawfully and forcefully
73 entering, or has unlawfully and forcefully entered, a
74 dwelling, residence, business property, or occupied vehicle,
75 or federally licensed nuclear power facility, or is in the
76 process of sabotaging or attempting to sabotage a federally
77 licensed nuclear power facility, or is attempting to remove,
78 or has forcefully removed, a person against his or her will
79 from any dwelling, residence, business property, or occupied
80 vehicle when the person has a legal right to be there, and
81 provided that the person using the deadly physical force knows
82 or has reason to believe that an unlawful and forcible entry
83 or unlawful and forcible act is occurring.
84 (2) The legal presumption that a person using deadly
Page 3

(2) The legal presumption that a person using deadly
SB188 INTRODUCED
85 physical force is justified to do so pursuant to this
86 subdivision does not apply if any of the following apply:
87 a. The person against whom the defensive force is used
88 has the right to be in or is a lawful resident of the
89 dwelling, residence, or vehicle, such as an owner or lessee,
90 and there is not an injunction for protection from domestic
91 violence or a written pretrial supervision order of no contact
92 against that person;
93 b. The person sought to be removed is a child or
94 grandchild, or is otherwise in the lawful custody or under the
95 lawful guardianship of, the person against whom the defensive
96 force is used;
97 c. The person who uses defensive force is engaged in an
98 unlawful activity or is using the dwelling, residence, or
99 occupied vehicle to further an unlawful activity; or
100 d. The person against whom the defensive force is used
101 is a law enforcement officer acting in the performance of his
102 or her official duties.
103 (b)(c) A person who is otherwise justified under
104 subsection (a) this section in using physical force, including
105 deadly physical force, and who is not engaged in an unlawful
106 activity, and who is in any place where he or she has the
107 right to be has no duty to retreat and has the right to stand
108 his or her ground.
109 (c)(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a)
110 or (b), a person is not justified in using physical force if
111 any of the following apply:
112 (1) With intent to cause physical injury or death to
Page 4

(1) With intent to cause physical injury or death to
SB188 INTRODUCED
113 another person, he or she provoked the use of unlawful
114 physical force by such the other person.
115 (2) He or she was the initial aggressor, except that
116 his or her use of physical force upon another person under the
117 circumstances is justifiable if he or she withdraws from the
118 encounter and effectively communicates to the other person his
119 or her intent to do so, but the latter other person
120 nevertheless continues or threatens the use of unlawful
121 physical force.
122 (3) The physical force involved was the product of a
123 combat by agreement not specifically authorized by law.
124 (e) At any time when a defense is claimed under this
125 section, if the defendant concealed, altered, destroyed, or
126 otherwise disposed of the deadly weapon or dangerous
127 instrument used in the commission of the alleged offense,
128 other than by voluntarily providing the unaltered deadly
129 weapon or dangerous instrument to law enforcement, there shall
130 be a rebuttable presumption that the defendant's use of
131 physical force, including deadly physical force, was not
132 justified.
133 (d)(f)(1) A person who uses force, including deadly
134 physical force, as justified and permitted in this section, is
135 immune from criminal prosecution and civil action for the use
136 of such force, unless the force was determined to be unlawful.
137 (2) Prior to the commencement of a trial in a case in
138 which a defense is claimed under this section, the court
139 having jurisdiction over the case, upon motion of the
140 defendant, shall conduct a pretrial hearing to determine
Page 5

defendant, shall conduct a pretrial hearing to determine
SB188 INTRODUCED
141 whether force, including deadly force, used by the defendant
142 was justified or whether it was unlawful under this section.
143 During any pretrial hearing to determine immunity, the
144 defendant must show by a preponderance of the evidence that he
145 or she is immune from criminal prosecution.
146 (3) If, after a pretrial hearing under subdivision (2),
147 the court concludes that the defendant has proven by a
148 preponderance of the evidence that force, including deadly
149 force, was justified, the court shall enter an order finding
150 the defendant immune from criminal prosecution and dismissing
151 the criminal charges.
152 (4) If the defendant does not meet his or her burden of
153 proving immunity at the pre-trial hearing, he or she may
154 continue to pursue the defense of self-defense or defense of
155 another person at trial. Once the issue of self-defense or
156 defense of another person has been raised by the defendant,
157 the state continues to bear the burden of proving beyond a
158 reasonable doubt all of the elements of the charged conduct.
159 (e)(g) A law enforcement agency may use standard
160 procedures for investigating the use of force described in
161 subsection (a)this section, but the agency may not arrest the
162 any person for using force unless it determines that there is
163 probable cause that the force used was unlawful."
164 Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
165 1, 2026.
Page 6